test/src/gt-norm-yamls/V-list_id_gt-norm.gen.yaml
  Verb - list: # from dictionary
  
    aatelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aatelistám
    acâgâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: acâgâst
    acâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaccât
    addiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: addiim
    adoptiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: adoptiim
    aibâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaibâš
    ainiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: äinee
    aittâlâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aittâlâst
    aitârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aitârdâm
    alaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: allaan
    aldaniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aldan
    aldediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aldeed
    algâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aalgât
    almaskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: almaask
    almostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: almostitám
    almostittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: almostit
    almottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: almoot
    amnâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aamnâst
    analysistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: analysistám
    anestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaneest
    anettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aaneet
    arbiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arbiim
    arbiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ärbee
    argumentistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: argumentistám
    argâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aargâš
    arvâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: arvâlistám
    arvâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aarvâš
    assimilistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: assimilistám
    atâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: atâštâm
    atâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aatâšt
    avediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: avveed
    avâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: aavâšt
    avžuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: avžut
    aštâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: aštâččâm
    cahâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caahâst
    capciistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: capcist
    capciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: capciim
    capâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: capâlistám
    cavâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caavvâd
    cavâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: caavâst
    ceggiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ceggiim
    ceggâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceeggâd
    ceggâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceggân
    cegâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ceeggât
    cekkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cekkiim
    celkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciälhám
    cevziđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciävzám
    cicestiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cicceest
    cicettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cicceet
    ciegâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciegâd
    ciegâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciegâst
    cilijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciilijd
    ciláidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciláiditám
    cimcâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cimcâhist
    cimostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cimmoost
    cipciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cipciim
    cipciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cipcee
    cirgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cirgiim
    cirgottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cirgoot
    cirgádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cirgáád
    cirhádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cirháád
    cirijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciirijd
    cisâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciissât
    civhádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciivhád
    ciähhááškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciähhááškuát
    ciähuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ciähuttâm
    ciähuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciähut
    ciŋkkááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ciŋkkát
    cogâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cooggâd
    cokkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cokkiim
    cokkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuákkee
    copciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: copciim
    culijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuulijd
    cullâgyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cullâguáđám
    culáidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: culáiditám
    cuoigiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuoigiim
    cuovkkiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuovkkit
    cuovkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuovkkiim
    cuovkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cyevkkee
    cuákkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuákká
    cuálkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cuálhám
    cuávgááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuávgát
    cuáŋuidittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuáŋuidit
    cuáŋuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cuáŋŋul
    cáhádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: cáhháád
    cäimiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cááimám
    cäähiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: cáávám
    delegistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: delegistám
    desinfistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: desinfistám
    eeijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäjám
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iälám
    eelliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iälá
    ejâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eejâš
    elettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eeleet
    eleškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: eleškuáđám
    eleškyettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eleškuát
    eliliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eellil
    elâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eellâl
    elâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eelâš
    enittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eennit
    epidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: eeppid
    estiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iästám
    estâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: estâlâm
    falskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falskiim
    falskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fälskee
    falâlistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: falâlistám
    falâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faallâl
    faskâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faaskât
    fastašiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fastaaš
    fastodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fastod
    fattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fattiim
    faŋgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: faŋgiim
    faŋgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fäŋgee
    faškâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faaškâst
    fađostiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: faađoost
    feeriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: feeriim
    feiliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: feiliim
    feilâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: feeilâst
    ferttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ferttiim
    fierriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fierriim
    fierttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fierttiim
    fierttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fierttee
    fiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiettiim
    fiettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fiettee
    fievridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fievrid
    fijliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fijliim
    filliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: filliim
    filliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fillee
    filmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: filmiim
    finniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: finniim
    finniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: finnee
    fiskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiskiim
    fiskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fiskood
    fiäránistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fiäránistám
    fiŋgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fiŋgeet
    fluoriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: fluoriim
    formatistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: formatistiim
    foskâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fooskâd
    foskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fooskâst
    fárudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fáárrud
    fäškittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: fääškit
    grilliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: grilliim
    haasiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haasiim
    hacciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hacciim
    hacciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häccee
    hacâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaccâg
    hacâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaccât
    haijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haijiim
    haijiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häijee
    hajijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haajijd
    haldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haldiim
    haldiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häldee
    haldâšiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haaldâš
    halijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haalijd
    halssiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: halssiim
    halssiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hälssee
    hammiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hammiim
    hammiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hämmee
    hamssâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hamssâl
    hamâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haamâst
    hapattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: happaat
    happiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: happit
    hardâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haardâš
    harijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haarijd
    harijdâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harijdâtâm
    harriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: harriim
    harriđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: härree
    harâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haarrâg
    hastâččiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haastâš
    hattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hattiim
    hattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hättee
    havdârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavdârd
    havriidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: havriid
    havrijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrijd
    havrâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrâd
    havrâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrâg
    havrâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haavrâst
    havviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: havviim
    havviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hävvee
    havvuustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: havvust
    haŋkettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: haŋkeet
    haŋkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: haŋkkiim
    haŋkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häŋkkee
    heeviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heevitâm
    heeviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heeviim
    heiviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heiviim
    heiviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heivee
    helijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heelijd
    helppiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: helppiim
    herkittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heerkit
    herskudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: herskud
    herviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: herviim
    herviđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hervee
    hervâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heervât
    hettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hettiim
    hettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hettee
    hettuuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hettut
    hevâniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heevvân
    hevâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heevât
    heŋgittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgit
    heŋgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: heŋgiim
    heŋgâsiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgâs
    heŋgâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: heeŋgâst
    hicciđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hicciim
    hilttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hilttiim
    himettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiimeet
    himodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: himmood
    hirmástuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hirmástutám
    hitodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hittood
    hivviittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hivvit
    hiäibustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäibust
    hiäibuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäibut
    hiäiluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäilut
    hiäimustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäimust
    hiäjuniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäijun
    hiämáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiämmásk
    hiäđuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hiäđut
    hiđásmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hiiđáásm
    hokâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hookkât
    horcâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hoorcâst
    hovkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hovkkiim
    hovkkiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávkkee
    huhkádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huhkáád
    huihádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuihád
    huksiittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huksit
    huksiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huksiim
    hulijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huulijd
    humijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huumijd
    humáskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huumáásk
    huolâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huolâstuđâm
    huolâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huolât
    hurediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurreed
    hurgettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurgeet
    hurgottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurgoot
    huridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuriid
    hurijdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huurijd
    hurtodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hurttood
    hutâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuttâg
    hutârdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huuttârd
    huvreluttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huvrelutám
    huálištiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huálišt
    huálšistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huálšist
    huámášittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huámášitám
    huánániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huánnán
    huánášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huánááš
    huáppulittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huáppulitám
    huáputtiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huápput
    huárástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huáráást
    huátistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huátist
    huávridiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrid
    huávristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrist
    huávráskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huávrásk
    huškottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huškoot
    hušottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: huššoot
    huššâlittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: huššâlitám
    hálbášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háálbáš
    hámmáristiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hámmáristám
    hámsádiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háámsád
    hánášiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háánááš
    hápármistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hápármistám
    hárjuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háárjut
    hárjániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hárján
    hárččuliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: hárččulâm
    hástuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háástut
    hávdudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: háávdud
    häittidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häittid
    hälbidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häälbid
    hälhistittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hälhistât
    hälhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häälhist
    härdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háárdám
    härjittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häärjit
    härvidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häärvid
    häskidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hääskid
    hästiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: háástám
    hävdidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: hävdid
    hävidiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: häävvid
    iberdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ibbeerd
    ijâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iijâst
    ilbodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ilbood
    illáástiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: illást
    ilodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: illood
    iloskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iiloosk
    ilosmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iiloosm
    ilottiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: illoot
    ilâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iillât
    ilâštiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iilâšt
    installistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: installistám
    irodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: irrood
    irâsmiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iirâsm
    irâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iirât
    iskâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iiskâd
    iskâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iiskâst
    itelistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: itelistám
    iteliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: itteel
    ivniđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: ivniim
    iäddudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iäddud
    iädudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iäddud
    iäljuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iäljut
    iällááttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iällát
    iälustiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iälust
    iäláskittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iäláskitám
    iäláskiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iäláásk
    iänáduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iänádutám
    iänáduttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iänádut
    iärdudiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iärdud
    iäruttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iärut
    iärvádittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iärváditám
    iätkálittiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: iätkálitám
    iätkániđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iätkáliđ
    iävtuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iävtut
    iävtuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iävtuttiđ
    išediđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iššeed
    iđettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: iiđeet
    ištâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: ištâd
    jaagiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jaagiim
    jalgodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalgood
    jalhettiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalheet
    jalkkaattiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jalkkat
    jamâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaamâd
    jamâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jamâstutám
    jamâstuttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jamâstut
    jaskodiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jaskood
    jehâliđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jeehâl
    jiellâhistiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: jiellâhistám
    jienâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jiennâd
    jienâstiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jienâst
    jienâttiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jienât
    jiesâgiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jiessâg
    jievžâdiđ+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: jievžâd
